Hawaii statutes.
[§601-18] Interest income.
Interest income earned on court deposits shall be credited to the depositor
specified in the court order or to the State of Hawaii if not otherwise
specified by statute. [L 1993, c 42, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next